Utah statutes.
53-7-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Utah Fire Prevention Board created in Section 53-7-203, except as provided in Part 3, Liquefied Petroleum Gas Act.

(2)  "Director" means the state fire marshal appointed in accordance with Section 53-7-103.

(3)  "Division" means the State Fire Marshal Division created in Section 53-7-103.

(4)  "Fire officer" means:

(a)  the state fire marshal;

(b)  the state fire marshal's deputies or salaried assistants;

(c)  the fire chief or fire marshal of any county, city, or town fire department;

(d)  the fire officer of any fire district;

(e)  the fire officer of any special service district organized for fire protection purposes; and

(f)  authorized personnel of any of the persons specified in Subsections (4)(a) through (e).

(5)  "Legislative action" includes legislation that:

(a)  adopts a state fire code;

(b)  amends a state fire code; or

(c)  repeals one or more provisions of a state fire code.

(6)  "State fire code" means the code adopted under Section 53-7-106.

(7)  "State fire marshal" means the fire marshal appointed director by the commissioner under Section 53-7-103.

